Washington statutes.
RCW 43.150.050

Programs and activities authorized.

The center, working in cooperation with individuals, local groups, and organizations throughout the state, may undertake any program or activity for which funds are available which furthers the goals of this chapter. These programs and activities may include, but are not limited to:

(1) Providing information about programs, activities, and resources of value to volunteers and to organizations operating or planning volunteer or citizen service programs;

(2) Sponsoring recognition events for outstanding individuals and organizations;

(3) Facilitating the involvement of business, industry, government, and labor in community service and betterment;

(4) Organizing, or assisting in the organization of, training workshops and conferences;

(5) Publishing schedules of significant events, lists of published materials, accounts of successful programs and programming techniques, and other information concerning the field of volunteerism and citizen service, and distributing this information broadly;

(6) Reviewing the laws and rules of the state of Washington, and proposed changes therein, to determine their impact on the success of volunteer activities and programs, and recommending such changes as seem appropriate to ensure the achievement of the goals of this chapter;

(7) Seeking funding sources for enhancing, promoting, and supporting the ethic of service and facilitating or providing information to those organizations and agencies which may benefit;

(8) Providing information about agencies and individuals who are working to prevent the spread of the human immunodeficiency virus, as defined in chapter 70.24 RCW, and to agencies and individuals who are working to provide health and social services to persons living with the human immunodeficiency virus, as defined in chapter 70.24 RCW.

[ 2020 c 76 s 20; 1992 c 66 s 5; 1988 c 206 s 301; 1982 1st ex.s. c 11 s 5.]